Alaska statutes. The Constitution of the State of Alaska
Article V Suffrage and Elections

Section 1. Qualified Voters.

Every citizen of the United States who is at least eighteen years of age, who meets registration residency requirements which may be prescribed by law, and who is qualified to vote under this article, may vote in any state or local election. A voter shall have been, immediately preceding the election, a thirty day resident of the election district in which he seeks to vote, except that for purposes of voting for President and Vice President of the United States other residency requirements may be prescribed by law. Additional voting qualifications may be prescribed by law for bond issue elections of political subdivisions.

Cross references. —

For voter qualification for presidential election, see AS

15.05.012

.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment, effective October 9, 1966 (4th Legislature’s SJR 1 (1966)), substituted “A voter” for “He” at the beginning of the second sentence, inserted the exception in that sentence and substituted “A voter” for “He” at the beginning of a former third sentence, which was deleted by a 1970 amendment.

The first 1970 amendment, effective October 10, 1970 (6th Legislature’s HJR 7 (1969)), substituted “eighteen” for “nineteen” in the first sentence.

The second 1970 amendment, effective October 10, 1970 (6th Legislature’s HJR 51 am S (1970)), deleted a former third sentence which read: “A voter shall be able to read or speak the English language as prescribed by law, unless prevented by physical disability.”

The amendment effective October 14, 1972 (7th Legislature’s HJR 126 am S (1972)) inserted “residency” in the first sentence and substituted “thirty day resident” for “for one year a resident of Alaska and for thirty days a resident” in the second sentence.

Legislative history reports. —

For report on 1969 House Joint Resolution No. 7, see 1969 House Journal, p. 443. For report on 1970 House Joint Resolution No. 51 (HJR 51 am S), see 1970 House Journal, p. 130.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The legislature must have intended that the point of measurement for qualifications other than those of residence be the same as set out in the constitution; that is, the same as the requirements for residence. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 21.

Any attempt to determine the eligibility of a voter as to residence (1) in the state and (2) in the election district, at any time other than the date of the election, would be unconstitutional. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 21.

This section of the constitution, holding that citizens who meet certain requirements may vote is one of the provisions that would preclude the banning of write-in votes. The other is Alaska Const., art. I, § 2 which states that government originates with the people and is founded on their will. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 30.

Any Alaskan qualified to vote under this section may also vote in a borough election without pre-registering. 1965 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 9.

The proper construction of this section is that reregistration less than 30 days prior to an election precludes the person from voting only in the district races of his new residency. Thus, if a person reregisters in his new district less than 30 days before an election, he may vote a questioned ballot in his new district, and his votes will be counted as to statewide candidates and issues (and other matters common to both districts). 1982 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 7.

Section 2. Disqualifications.

No person may vote who has been convicted of a felony involving moral turpitude unless his civil rights have been restored. No person may vote who has been judicially determined to be of unsound mind unless the disability has been removed.

Cross references. —

For disqualification for felony conviction, see AS

15.05.030

.

Section 3. Methods of Voting; Election Contests.

Methods of voting, including absentee voting, shall be prescribed by law. Secrecy of voting shall be preserved. The procedure for determining election contests, with right of appeal to the courts, shall be prescribed by law.

Cross references. —

For election contests, see AS

15.20.540

et seq. and notes thereto.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The legislature has no power to designate particular seats in the house of representatives to which candidates must seek nomination and election. Likewise, there is nothing in the constitution to indicate that the advisory reapportionment board or the governor has the power to so designate the seats. 1961 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 20.

The legislature may provide by law for appeal to the courts to decide election contests involving members of the legislature or Congress, but the legislature is the sole judge of the election qualifications of its members. March 29, 1963 Op. Att’y Gen.

Section 4. Voting Precincts; Registration.

The legislature may provide a system of permanent registration of voters, and may establish voting precincts within election districts.

Section 5. General Elections.

General elections shall be held on the second Tuesday in October of every even-numbered year, but the month and day may be changed by law.

Cross references. —

For statutory provisions changing the date of general elections, see AS

15.15.020

.